Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [116.2025] SALT APPLICATORS; VOLUNTARY CERTIFICATION PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "certified commercial applicator" means an individual who applies deicer, completed training on snow and ice removal and deicer application approved by the commissioner, and passed an examination after completing the training; new text end new text begin (2) "commercial applicator'' means an individual who applies deicer for hire but does not include a municipal, state, or other government employee; new text end new text begin (3) "deicer'' means any substance used to melt snow and ice, or used for its anti-icing effects, on privately owned surfaces traveled by pedestrians and vehicles; and new text end new text begin (4) "owner" means a person that owns or leases real estate and that enters into a written contract with a certified commercial applicator for snow and ice removal and deicer application. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Voluntary certification program; best management practices; training. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must develop a training program that promotes best management practices for snow and ice removal and deicer application that protect water quality and allows commercial applicators to obtain certification as a water-friendly applicator. The commissioner must certify a commercial applicator as a water-friendly applicator if the applicator successfully completes the program and passes the examination. new text end new text begin (b) Certification under this subdivision must be renewed every ten years. The commissioner must provide additional training under this section for certified commercial applicators renewing certification after their initial training and certification. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must provide the training and testing module at locations statewide and may make the recertification training available online. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner must designate other entities that are approved to provide the training required under this subdivision and to administer the examination. The commissioner must maintain a list of approved training providers on the agency's website. By the fifth business day of each month, an approved training provider must submit a list of commercial applicators that completed the training and passed the examination in the preceding month. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner must annually post the best management practices and a list of certified commercial applicators on the agency's website. new text end new text begin (f) The commissioner or approved training provider may charge a fee of no more than $350 per certified commercial applicator for certification or recertification training under this section. An approved training provider may retain half of the fee and must submit the remainder to the commissioner. Fees submitted to and fees collected by the commissioner under this paragraph must be deposited in the environmental fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Liability. new text end new text begin (a) A certified commercial applicator or an owner is not liable for damages arising from hazards resulting from the accumulation of snow and ice on any real estate maintained by the certified commercial applicator when the hazard is solely caused by snow or ice and the certified commercial applicator used the best management practices for snow and ice removal and deicing approved by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in paragraph (a) prevents or limits the liability of a certified commercial applicator or owner if the certified commercial applicator or owner: new text end new text begin (1) commits an act or omission that constitutes gross negligence or willful or wanton disregard for the safety of entrants onto real estate of the owner that is maintained by the certified commercial applicator and that act or omission proximately causes injury, damage, or death; new text end new text begin (2) intentionally injures an entrant on real estate of the owner that is maintained by the certified commercial applicator; or new text end new text begin (3) fails to comply with the best management practices for snow and ice removal and deicer application approved by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) The liability of a commercial applicator who applies deicer but is not certified under this section may not be determined under the standards provided in this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Record keeping. new text end new text begin A certified commercial applicator must maintain the following records as part of the best management practices approved by the commissioner: new text end new text begin (1) a copy of the applicator's certification and any recertification issued under this section; new text end new text begin (2) evidence of passing the examination approved by the commissioner; new text end new text begin (3) copies of the winter maintenance assessment tool requirements developed by the commissioner; new text end new text begin (4) a written record describing the road, parking lot, and property maintenance practices used. The written record must include the type and rate of application of deicer used, the dates of treatment, and the weather conditions for each event requiring deicing. The records must be kept for a minimum of six years; and new text end new text begin (5) proof of compliance with the reporting requirements under subdivision 7. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Penalty. new text end new text begin The commissioner may revoke or decline to renew the certification of a commercial applicator who violates this section or rules adopted under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Relation to other law. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section affects municipal liability under section 466.03. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Reporting required. new text end new text begin By July 1 each year, a certified commercial applicator must submit to the commissioner on a form prescribed by the commissioner the amounts and types of deicers used in the previous calendar year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to claims arising on or after that date. new text end